Massachusetts, session 194th, S1230.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 276 is hereby amended by adding the following new section:-
Section 33 ½.
(1) Definitions:
(a) “Emergency medical condition” a medical condition, whether physical, behavioral,
related to a substance use disorder, or mental, manifesting itself by symptoms of sufficient
severity, including but not limited to severe pain, that the absence of prompt medical attention
could reasonably be expected by a prudent layperson who possesses an average knowledge of
health and medicine to result in placing the health of the person or another person in serious
jeopardy, serious impairment to body function or serious dysfunction of any body organ or part.
(b) “Medically unstable,” any condition, whether physical, behavioral, or related to
substance use or mental health disorders, that manifests in an unstable medical or mental health
of 3

status, which could reasonably be understood by a prudent layperson to lead to an emergency
medical condition.
(c) “Law enforcement agency”, (i) a state, county, municipal or district law enforcement
agency, including, but not limited to: a city, town or district police department, the office of
environmental law enforcement, the University of Massachusetts police department, the
department of the state police, the Massachusetts Port Authority police department, also known
as the Port of Boston Authority police department, and the Massachusetts Bay Transportation
Authority police department; (ii) a sheriff’s department in its performance of police duties and
functions; or (iii) a public or private college, university or other educational institution or
hospital police department.
(d) “Law enforcement officer” or “officer”, any officer of an agency, including the head
of the agency; a special state police officer appointed pursuant to section 58 or section 63 of
chapter 22C; a special sheriff appointed pursuant to section 4 of chapter 37 performing police
duties and functions; a deputy sheriff appointed pursuant to section 3 of said chapter 37
performing police duties and functions; a constable executing an arrest for any reason; or any
other special, reserve or intermittent police officer.
(e) “Correctional officer”, any officer with supervisory, custodial, or other control
responsibilities within a correctional agency.
(f) “Correctional agency”, the Department of Corrections, a House of Corrections, or a
jail.
(g) “Medical personnel”, any person licensed to provide health care, including but not
limited to an emergency medical technician, physician or nurse.
of 3

(2)Any person who experiences an emergency medical condition or is medically unstable
while in direct audio or visual contact with, or under the custody or control of, a law enforcement
or correctional officer shall have the right to be provided with emergency medical services.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a law enforcement or correctional
officer shall immediately request emergency medical services for any person who is under such
officer's custody or control or otherwise in direct audio or visual contact with the officer when
such person: (1) Has communicated to the officer that the person is (A) experiencing an
emergency medical condition, or (B) medically unstable, or (2) has been reasonably observed by
the officer to be (A) experiencing an emergency medical condition, or (B) medically unstable.
(4) A law enforcement or correctional officer shall not be required to request emergency
medical services when such officer (1) has made a reasonable determination that the person is
not (A) experiencing an emergency medical condition, or (B) medically unstable, and (2) knows
that such person has been seen by a medical professional within the previous twenty-four hours
and was released from such medical professional's care after a determination that such person
was not (A) experiencing an emergency medical condition, or (B) medically unstable.
(5) In circumstances where medical personnel and law enforcement or correctional
officers are simultaneously involved, a law enforcement or correctional officer shall immediately
allow medical personnel to commence treatment for any person who is under such officer's
custody or control when such person: (1) Has communicated to the officer that the person is (A)
experiencing an emergency medical condition, or (B) medically unstable, or (2) has been
reasonably observed by the officer to be (A) experiencing an emergency medical condition, or
(B) medically unstable.
of 3